Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB862.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 901(c), (d) and (e) of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended, subsection (a.1) is amended by adding an introductory paragraph and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 901. Filling vacancies in elective borough offices.* * *(a.1) Vacancy by resignation.--Except as provided in subsection (e), the following shall apply:* * *(c) [Unfilled vacancies.--If the council of any borough refuses, fails, neglects or is unable, for any reason whatsoever, to fill any vacancy within 30 days after the vacancy 123456789101112131415161718 happens, as provided in this section, the vacancy shall be filled within 15 additional days by the vacancy board.] Vacancy board.--(1) A vacancy board shall be convened to fill any vacancy within 15 days if the council of any borough, for any reason, fails to fill a vacancy after 30 days. The council may vote to convene the vacancy board within 30 days of a vacancy if it is unable, for any reason, to fill the vacancy and provides its justification in a public meeting.(2) The vacancy board shall consist of the council, exclusive of the mayor, and one registered elector of the borough who shall be appointed by the council at the council's first meeting each calendar year or as soon as practical and who shall act as chair of the vacancy board. The chairperson of the vacancy board shall not vote for themselves to fill the vacancy in any elective borough office.(3) The vacancy board shall appoint a registered elector of the borough, or ward in the case of a ward office, to hold the office, if the term continues that long, until the first Monday in January after the first municipal election occurring more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which election an eligible individual shall be elected to the office for the remainder of the term.(d) [Board] Vacancy board petition.--[If the vacancy is not filled by the vacancy board within 15 days, the] The vacancy board chair shall, or, in the case of a vacancy in the chair, the remaining members of the vacancy board shall, petition the court of common pleas to fill the vacancy by the appointment of a registered elector of the borough, or ward in the case of a 20250SB0862PN0973 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ward, to hold the office, if the term continues that long, until the first Monday in January after the first municipal election occurring more than 60 days after the vacancy occurs, at which election an eligible individual shall be elected to the office for the remainder of the term[.(e) Elector petition.--If vacancies exist in more than a majority of the offices of council, the court of common pleas shall fill the vacancies upon presentation of petition signed by not less than 15 registered electors of the borough.] if either of the following occur:(1) the vacancy board fails to fill the position within 15 days; or(2) the position of chairperson is vacant and the remaining members of the vacancy board provide a justification for the reason the remaining members cannot fill the position sooner than 15 days and vote publicly to disband.(f) General vacancy petition.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if vacancies exist in more than a majority of the offices of council, the court of common pleas shall fill the vacancies upon presentation of a petition signed by not less than 15 registered electors of the borough or the remaining council members. A resignation that precludes a majority of council members from acting to accept the resignation shall create a vacancy on the date specified in the tendered resignation or, if no date is specified, the second business day after the day tendered, unless sooner withdrawn in writing.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0862PN0973 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829